%BOM---------------------
Date:1/7/2003 10:23:38 PM
From:Grommit
Dividends. Big article in Wall Street Journal on preparing for the tax plan.
They say the winning bets are high dividend stocks, cash rich companies and
preferred stocks. But most preferred stocks have a redemption value and
redemption or maturity date. That would cap the value of those securities.
(Yes, they can trade above the redemption value, but not as time goes by.)

So after initially nodding my head and thinking to unload my REITs and buy
preferreds, I'm not so sure. Ignoring the issue that most securities are held
in tax advantaged accounts --- If we think like economists.... people will bid
up the price on dividend stocks until the yield is appropriate for the risk
level. Which is where it is now! The only change is taxes. People will require
the same yield after tax as they require now. And price adjustments will follow
accordingly. So we're looking at a one time gain for dividend stocks, no one
time gain for REITs, and a small gain for Preferred stocks.

examples --
A dividend stock that sells for $10, and pays 5% (before tax), would yield
around 3% after tax. So with no taxes, and requiring a 3% after tax yield, the
price is bid up to $16.6. A nice 60% gain.

However, if you have a $25 at maturity Preferred stock, and it is redeemable in
2005, and it's selling at $26, and paying 8% or $2 per year, the before tax
yield is 6.9% to maturity. Tax it, and you get 4.1% net yield. To lower that
yield to 4.1% (with no taxes), you need to bid the price up to $26.80. That's
only a 3% windfall in price apprciation -- 80 cents. Not very much.

I think the journal is missing something -- or am I?

thanks
grommit

related issue -- is there a way to economically convert (taxable) capital gains
into (untaxed) dividends. Like buying a stock just before ex-dividend, then
sell ex-div at the lower value (to get a capital loss), and pocket the dividend
(tax free). Or maybe Mr. Market will adjust accordingly and the ex div stock
drops will be smaller in the future. hmmm.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/7/2003 11:57:41 PM
From:James Clarke
<<A dividend stock that sells for $10, and pays 5% (before tax), would yield
around 3% after tax. So with no taxes, and requiring a 3% after tax yield, the
price is bid up to $16.6. A nice 60% gain. >>

Imagine a company with the same business and same cash flows that simply
chooses not to pay a dividend. That business is worth 10. Do you really believe
the dividend payer will trade for 60% more just because dividends are tax
deductible? If that happens I'm going to have a field day doing long-short
trades.

I think the flaw in your argument is that an intelligent investor like you
doesn't buy a stock to target an after-tax yield (if they do it is at their
peril). The yield is balanced by capital gains expectation, which doesn't
change.

Maybe this effects things a touch on the margin, but a business is going to
trade at what it is worth. I've never found dividend policy - all else being
equal - to change that.

What kind of special situation might benefit from dividends being tax
deductible. Take a look at Deb Shops (DEBS). This is a high ROA and very
consistent retailer with a pile of cash on its balance sheet and the second or
third generation of the founding family in control of capital allocation. Looks
significantly undervalued if there is any hope for shareholders to get the cash
in some theoretical endgame. In the last few years they have shown a new and
accelerating desire to pay out dividends (the last three years the dividend
payout has been increased from 20 cents to 30 cents to 40 cents annually and
they could afford to pay out a lot more than that), but they've still got $9 of
cash on the books and earn more faster than they can pay it out. The control
shareholders clearly hate to pay taxes. There's a situation where something big
could change with a different tax law.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 2:02:58 AM
From:Bob Rudd
OT - Taxation of corporate dividends:<<sectors which could be hurt by this
idea. What would happen to the muni bond market>>Making already-taxed dividends
tax-exempt would, of course, cause some heavy dividend payers to be bid up
[already has] vs non-affected sectors such as Reits, Treasuries and Muni's.
Since money markets are among the non-affected areas, money may be drawn from
them to dividend paying equities. Muni's will probably not suffer much net as
this years record issuance should subside...the supply has pushed muni yields
to a narrow discount to taxables. Reits are due for a pullback.
Depending on how the new rules are structured, there could be some 'game
playing' like dividend capture: Tax changes like this nearly always throw off
unintended consequences.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 9:00:44 AM
From:Bob Rudd
OT? Healthcare backgrounder - This says nothing about individual stocks or
companies, but provides context info on healthcare spending: 'Spending on
Health Care Increased Sharply in 2001' [Article is free with signup for 7 days]
http://www.nytimes.com/2003/01/08/health/08HEAL.html
[If anyone considers this sort of thing too far afield from thread and thus
wasteful clutter, please let me know - I post it because HC related stocks have
been discussed extensively and, according to this, HC spending is 14.9% of
total economy]
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 9:17:51 AM
From:Bob Rudd
DEBS looks interesting: Positives include very reasonable enterpise multiples
[Even with options factored]. They do have considerable lease obligations, but
multiples remain reasonable:
EV/(EBITDA)=(13.7*23.4-139.7)/47.8=3.8
EV/(EBITDA-CAPEX)=(13.7*23.4-139.7)/(47.8-6)=4.3
EV/FCF=(13.7*23.4-139.7)/(30-6)=7.5

INCLUDING MAX? DILUTION FROM OPTIONS 13.7+1.35=15.05:
EV/(EBITDA)=(15.05*23.4-139.7)/47.8=4.4
EV/(EBITDA-CAPEX)=(15.05*23.4-139.7)/(47.8-6)= 5.1
EV/FCF=(15.05*23.4-139.7)/(30-6)=8.9

Considiring OpLeases adjusted [*.67] to debt(.67*136=91.12):
EV/(EBITDA)=(15.05*23.4+91.12-139.7)/47.8=6.4
EV/(EBITDA-CAPEX)=(15.05*23.4+91.12-139.7)/(47.8-6)=7.3
EV/FCF=(15.05*23.4+91.12-139.7)/(30-6)=12.6

Concerning is the actions/attitude of the controlling shareholders/managment -
these guys aren't Buffet. The recent stock option plan bothered shareholders
and I can see no reason they can't/won't vote themselves the store. Dilution
from the current plan is not intolerable, but what will they do next? Longterm
followers [Yahoo board & Fool] have indicated the management is not responsive
or shareholder freindly.
So, like so many, this boils down to an aproach-avoidance conflict Cheap price
vs questionable management/governance. Then there's fashion risk.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 9:49:33 AM
From:chaz
The options turned me off real quick. Just doesn't pass the sniff test as far
as I'm concerned, no matter the other numbers.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 10:34:03 AM
From:Grommit
>Maybe this effects things a touch on the margin, but a business is going to
trade at what it is worth. I've never found dividend policy - all else being
equal - to change that.

You may have hit the nail on the head here. At least for the common shares.
Also, if dividends are treated differently from interest, then I expect a lot
of companies will issue preferred shares in bulk.

>I think the flaw in your argument is that an intelligent investor like you
doesn't buy a stock to target an after-tax yield. The yield is balanced by
capital gains expectation, which doesn't change.

Certainly true for common stock. Thanks for the comment. But perhaps my
analysis holds for the preferred shares, i.e. not much movement in price, in
theory, and especially when you consider all the shares held by corporations
and by tax deferred accounts.

thanks!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 4:01:53 PM
From:Bob Rudd
ACAS & ALD Fat dividends & potentially more favorable tax treatment got me
digging - Came up with this:
1/8/03 Herb G: BUSINESS-DEVELOPMENT COMPANY DIVIDENDS MIGHT NOT BE INCLUDED IN
THE PLAN?
Dividend dollop: I can hear the brokers now as they called investors last night
trying to sell American Capital's (ACAS:Nasdaq - news - commentary - research -
analysis) spot secondary offering. At 4 million shares, the deal was double
what brokers at the underwriting firms were telling people yesterday. Never
mind the dilution to existing holders -- look what they had to sell to
individual investors: A high-yielding dividend stock at a time when taxes on
dividends are likely to be cut.
Think anybody ever told those investors that BUSINESS-DEVELOPMENT COMPANY
DIVIDENDS MIGHT NOT BE INCLUDED IN THE PLAN?

Even American Capital bull Donald Destino of Banc of America Securities says HE
DOESN'T EXPECT THE TAX SITUATION WITH BDC DIVIDENDS TO BE CHANGED. In last
night's downgrade of American Capital rival Allied Capital (ALD:NYSE - news -
commentary - research - analysis), Destino wrote, "IT IS OUR VIEW THAT THE AIM
OF DIVIDEND TAX RELIEF IS TO ELIMINATE DOUBLE TAXATION OF DIVIDENDS AND WOULD
LIKELY EXCLUDE DIVIDENDS PAID BY COMPANIES LIKE ALLIED THAT PASS ON PRETAX
INCOME IN THE FORM OF DIVIDENDS. In fact, IF THE DIVIDENDS OF COMPANIES LIKE
ALLIED ARE EXCLUDED FROM TAX RELIEF, IT COULD PROVE TO BE A NEGATIVE FOR
VALUATION."

Remarkably, in the same piece Destino continued to rate American Capital as a
buy, with a $31 target. Isn't that a double standard, especially in light of
what he wrote about Allied? Not when American Capital is trying to raise cash!
Wouldn't want to get in the way of that, would we?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 4:23:45 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Tax plan contains a hidden Cap Gains tax cut according to report on CNBC. The
provision makes it neutral to retain earnings or pay them out in dividends by
reducing cap gains by amount company retains during holding period. I'm sure it
will be in the news soon. Time to look hard at HRB...this would be amazingly
complex to implement and report.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 5:00:04 PM
From:Paul Senior
Hey! Are you trying to tweak us ACAS/ALD stockholders?

:>)

Greenberg's been writing negative stuff on these business development companies
for months. He never misses a chance to expound the negative.

It is too early to predict the demise of these high dividend payers just
because they might not be providing tax free dividends under the proposed laws.
For example, it won't make any difference (I am guessing) to anybody holding
ACAS or ALD now in a 401K plan. Because anything coming out of the 401 gets
taxed at the person's tax rate at the coming-out time regardless if monies went
in tax-free or taxable. So that 11% yield in ACAS is still juicy.

And there's the issue of deductibility of margin interest. Now you can offset
margin interest with dividend income. If div. income becomes tax-free to the
taxpayer I doubt that the gov't will let such offsets continue. So I'm saying
it might be a positive to have stocks like ACAS, ALD in margin accounts. But
who can tell yet?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 5:13:42 PM
From:Paul Senior
More on the hidden cap. gains cut:

It does look complex. I see it as a paperwork nightmare too.

http://www.forbes.com/business/2003/01/07/cz_jn_0107beltway.html
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 5:29:10 PM
From:Dale Baker
All the classics of doublespeak:

"MIGHT NOT BE INCLUDED IN THE PLAN?.....DOESN'T EXPECT THE TAX SITUATION WITH
BDC DIVIDENDS TO BE CHANGED....IT IS OUR VIEW THAT THE AIM OF DIVIDEND TAX
RELIEF .... In fact, IF THE DIVIDENDS OF COMPANIES LIKE ALLIED ARE EXCLUDED
FROM TAX RELIEF, IT COULD PROVE TO BE A NEGATIVE..."

Once you toss out the filler and distill the passage down to the qualified
conditional phrases, it doesn't pass for warm crapola to a horsefly on a sunny
day.

In other words, the author hides behind rhetorical BS to play on somebody's
fear factor. Doesn't wash in my book. I spent years in the government PR
machine cranking out this nonsense, it looks very familiar.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 6:17:55 PM
From:Bob Rudd
<<Are you trying to tweak us ACAS/ALD stockholders?>> Actually just trying to
reveal that they weren't likely included...The dividend is more than
competitive on an after tax basis as long as the short case doesn't prove out.
There's not really a lot of high dividend stocks that don't have substantial
problems.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 6:29:24 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Good article, Paul. Did you see the companion piece "Dividend All-Stars"...?
They list 10 co's as 'Top Dividend-Paying Companies' 7 pay dividends less than
1% the other 3 are around 2%. Not exactly hot stuff, methinks.
http://www.forbes.com/2003/01/07/cx_aw_0107dividend.html
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 6:51:22 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Dale: The substance of the quote is that ALD & ACAS dividends are based on
pass-thru of pre-tax income, like REITs and many MLPs, and thus won't qualify
for tax releif at the investor level since they aren't double-taxed. I offered
it because, prior to running across it, I thought they might get a big boost
from better tax treatment. Investing on that premise would be a mistake and I
wanted to share that with the thread.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/8/2003 8:35:25 PM
From:Don Earl
Paul,

Interesting article. What it basically amounts to is companies would be
reporting "dividends" which are their actual non GAAP earnings. It would be a
bookkeeping nightmare for private investors and probably at least as bad for
fund managers. The cost basis on every stock in every portfolio would have to
be adjusted every quarter.

It seems to me it would eliminate the motivation of most companies to continue
paying cash dividends, when everyone else will be declaring cost basis
dividends. I doubt it will cause the stock market to go up 20% once the average
investor figures out how little money most of these companies are actually
making on the Federal income tax level. The big plus IMO is it would go a long
way toward eliminating GAAP reporting, which is something I'm in favor of, but
it will cause one honey of a correction if it becomes law.

The interesting part is it might actually have some potential to stimulate the
economy since companies would be able to report "dividends" on retained
earnings which could then be used for capital expenditures, plus there would be
some incentive for companies to pay more taxes to add hype value to the stocks.

As a "tax break" it doesn't amount to much, but as a major change in securities
regulations, it's the most remarkably twisty thing I've ever seen pretending to
be something else. My guess is it will get shot down in flames once a few
lobbyists twig to what it is. Still, considering it's the only clever idea I've
seen come out of the Bush administration, I kind of wonder if an under cover
Democrat has managed to penetrate the inner circle. Too funny.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 1:23:47 AM
From:Paul Senior
Bob Rudd, I hadn't seen that other article, "Dividend All-Stars". Thanks.

Other times though I have caught one-page articles around some sort of screen
some Forbes staffer gets the bright idea of running. Basically it winds up
being a list of half dozen stocks - top yielders, or top combo yield + growth
stocks, or best ROE and div., etc. Occasionally helpful.

I've also noticed lately how tiresome are the continual Forbes pop-up ads for
Ken Fisher and his predictions and latest research. -g-

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 3:02:00 AM
From:Dale Baker
I offered my perspective because Greenberg has a clear agenda with the BDC's to
spin all the mights and maybes in favor of his argument. I appreciate the
thoughtful discussion of the issue here even though I only have a short-term
option position in one BDC, ACAS.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 6:22:39 AM
From:Bob Rudd
Dale: While I agree that HG looks at ALD/ACAS with brown-colored glasses, the
analysts' comments on dividend taxability ring true and are easily verifiable
with a call to IR. I currently have no position, but if the dividends were to
become non-taxable it would be far more impactful with these two @ 9.5 & 11.2%
yields respectively than the vast majority dividend paying stocks.
Nearly all analysts/journalists/commentators have some sort of bias/agenda.
HG's is clearly toward the short/bear case, but he's outnumbered by analysts
with bullish bias. I try to look to each for insights on the plus's &/or
minus's, but to neither for a final call...evan a biased source may offer a
useful insight or perspective on risk or reward of a stock that might not
otherwise be seen.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 6:38:08 AM
From:Bob Rudd
<<It would be a bookkeeping nightmare for private investors and probably at
least as bad for fund managers>>The costs to companies and investors of
tracking & reporting the info needed to support this would offset the benefits
and then some. One would think that this complexity combined with 'tax break
for the rich' arguments and a thin republican majority...with even some
republicans like McCain opposed, will prevent passage of the dividend tax
breaks....which may be why the market's backing away from the dividend rally.
Here's a NYT article highlighting the difficulty passing this: "Democrats Who
Backed Tax Cut in '01 Balk Now"
http://www.nytimes.com/2003/01/09/politics/09ECON.html
Excerpt: <<In 2001, President Bush was able to garner enough bipartisan support
in the thinly divided Senate to pass his $1.35 trillion tax cut package. This
time, however, even the president's Republican supporters predict a tougher
road.

"There are a number of Democrats who voted with him on the last tax cut, and
also a number of Republicans, who are not willing to just accept this one as a
fait accompli and take it as it is," Senator John B. Breaux, Democrat of
Louisiana, said in an interview, adding that the dividend tax cut would have to
be "replaced and/or dramatically scaled down.">>
I pass this on because investing based on a false premise, that dividends are
likely to not to be taxed, will produce adverse outcomes when the thesis
unwinds.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 6:51:00 AM
From:Dale Baker
I am not questioning the value of different points of view; it was specifically
the rhetorical style of stringing together a series of weak conditional phrases
to imply a conclusion that doesn't have the merits to stand on its own as a
positive declaration.

But the average reader sees the conclusion much more vividly than the language
it is couched in.

Greenberg's publication is 10% owned by David Rocker, who runs a hedge fund
with publicly stated positions in many of the stocks that Greenberg writes
about. Hurting ACAS helps one of Greenberg's bosses.

That is an agenda far beyond the usual varying analyst points of view on a
subject. It reminds me of a politician bashing a proposal for a project that
would draw funds away from another project that a major campaign contributor
benefits from.

Both Greenberg and the politician are not breaking the law. But it is certainly
unethical not to reveal the full web of conflicted interests.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 10:15:25 AM
From:Brendan W
re: bookkeeping nightmare
I agree that bookkeeping would be more difficult, but i think nightmare is an
exaggeration. Companies would have to post quarterly basis additions. Somebody
will provide a service to tell you what your basis now is given a certain
purchase price and date by summing up the basis additions. This is done now for
free on yahoo for stock splits and spinoffs which are also a pain to account
for.

The benefits from more favorable tax treatment and from capital flowing more
freely from less deserving to more deserving investments i think makes this
proposal attractive.

Three interesting things about this proposal are:
first, if you want complex, implement this proposal PARTIALLY as is being
discussed. If the administration doesn't get this at 100% of corporate taxed
income won't be taxed again, but only say 40%, it will be all the more
confusing. I hope the partial (or even worse, phased) implementation is not
done... and it's up or down on this proposal.

Second, this proposal should benefit low-PE investments as i think as most that
have higher GAAP income will have higher taxable income.

Third, i don't understand what will happen when companies have taxable losses.
Surely they will offset taxable income and DECREASE your basis. The interesting
scenario is when you have NET taxable losses since your initial investment. It
would seem your basis would be less than your initial purchase price. I like
this aspect from a topdown view of a capitalist economy as investors will have
more incentive to move investments to more deserving companies.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 10:15:42 AM
From:Bob Rudd
Dale: I agree the language contains many qualifiers, but isn't that appropriate
given that the dividend tax provision is 'proposed' and will probably be
modified or eliminated during the legislative process?
I looked at ACAS 10-k and it appears that they are structured to pass thru
pre-tax income and as such would not recieve any benefit from a proposal
designed to eliminate double taxation...so the analyst quoted in the peice was
likely correct on that. [Look under the section entitled 'The Company’s
Operations as a BDC and RIC'].
While Rocker owns 39k of TSCM's 23.6mm shares, I doubt that makes him HG's
'boss' rather I would say Rocker assoc. Cohodes is a source and strong
influence...but not to the degree that analysts were influenced by multi-mm$
bonus payouts from IB interests. Nevertheless, I would expect that HG sees his
mission to point out red flags and negative issues and that's what he was doing
in the article...and I think it does holders and non-holders a service to have
it pointed out that there's little liklihood that the ALD/ACAS dividends would
be tax free...thus one should not increase positions based on the false premise
that they would be tax free.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 10:40:15 AM
From:Bob Rudd
<<bookkeeping nightmare>>As I read this, in order to determine capital gains
subject to tax, you have to know the change in retained earnings during your
specific holding period. That would imply the necessity of the company
calculating and reporting that daily and the investor tracking it along with
cost basis and inputing beginning and ending retained earning on Schedule D.
For the company to do this would require daily computation of what are now
quarterly financials...so I would expect some sort of compromise...wait,
actually I don't expect this to pass at all...there may be some dividend relief
like reinstatement of some level of dividend exclusion, but nothing like what
they are currently proposing. There just isn't the support for it and too many
competing uses of tax revenues - the war on terror, on Iraq, healthcare
changes, unemployment extentions, helping the states...at a time when we're
already running a deficit. Also, many advocates of tax reduction/change do so
on the basis that the code is excessively complex. No one from that camp can
support this.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 2:51:04 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Floyd Norris on dividend complexities:
http://www.nytimes.com/2003/01/09/business/09PLAC.html?pagewanted=print&positio
=bottom
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 3:00:08 PM
From:upanddown
Lots of complexities and definitely both winners and losers. The conventional
wisdom has been to hold dividend-payers in a tax-deferred account to avoid
current tax liability. Why would you want to do that if dividends that would be
tax-free in a taxable account would be taxed at your full marginal rate when
withdrawals are made from the IRA?

It could also sharply raise borrowing costs for tax-free municipal bond issuers
just when the public sector is struggling with huge deficits.

Nothing is ever simple in the wonderful world of taxation.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 3:18:05 PM
From:Don Earl
Bob,

I don't see much additional accounting burden on companies. They're already
have to have the Federal tax numbers available in addition to their GAAP
reporting. A footnote in the PRs and the quarterly reports is about all that
would be required. Where it gets messy is going back over every trade to see
when it was purchased and digging the information out of the filings to see how
much cost basis to add.

What I think makes it interesting is it would put pressure on companies to
report per share results on the second set of books. If XYZ trades for $60 and
reports $4 a year in earnings, investors are going to want the extra $4 added
to their cost basis. If XYZ is aggressively using loopholes in GAAP to come up
with $4 but is only paying Federal tax on .50, it makes the discrepancy a lot
more visible than the current system of entering a tax liability or "other"
liability someplace on the balance sheet. After awhile even the least savvy
investor will figure out that a PE of 120 is not so good, even with a GAAP PE
of 15.

I think it would go a long way toward creating enough public awareness of the
flaws in GAAP accounting to eventually eliminate the system in favor of tax
accounting, but this backdoor approach of inventing cost basis dividends
strikes me as being too unwieldy to become law.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 3:21:09 PM
From:Bob Rudd
For IRA's, Reits & High yield corporates [thru funds], MLP's like WEG, or BDC's
like ACAS/ALD [If you doubt the bear case] would be better choices. There
really aren't many stocks paying yields above 3% that offer significant growth
and that don't have big hairy warts [Like tobacco litigation].
Muni's may be a contrarian play: As they sell off in reaction to the new
competition from coming tax-free dividends, they may offer a buying opportunity
to those who are willing to speculate that not much of a dividend tax break
really makes it thru in the final bill that passes. I'd currently say that
outcome has 70% probability given the resistance, deficits and other funding
demands.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 3:42:44 PM
From:Bob Rudd
<<They're already have to have the Federal tax numbers available in addition to
their GAAP reporting>>If I buy and sell at end of quarter dates coincident with
filings, that would be true, but my holding periods seldom coincide with this,
so how do I get data that coincides with my specific holding period if the co's
don't provide it? There could be an intra-quarter event like a charge or merger
that dramatically changes the situation.
Remember the old dividend exclusion - 1st $200 or something like that were
excluded I suspect something structured like that, but at a higher amount
[2-20k?] is going to drop out at the end of this process. Simple and helpful to
the vast majority of voters without providing a big, expensive windfall to the
top 2%.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/9/2003 9:13:39 PM
From:Don Earl
Bob,

I didn't get the impression any of this was going to some kind of prorated
system. If you're a shareholder of record on the dividend date, you declare the
dividend.

What makes it complicated is you would have to keep track of every stock you
own as far as when you bought it and how many dividends had been declared while
you owned it. If you averaged down or added to the position several times,
you'd have to calculate the cost basis for each buy. If you sold part of the
position after making several buys spread out over a period of time, you'd have
to keep track of if the sale was first in first out, or last in first out as
long as you held the remainder of the stock.

For a person who sets aside money every month to go into a mutual fund, the
fund would likely have to keep track of the information for each individual
investor. Since companies don't report on the same day, or even for the same
fiscal period, and funds tend to spread their buys and sells over a long period
of time, a fund with 100 equities would be making some sort of adjustment
almost every day. They would then have to calculate the cost basis for every
single customer.

Then you'd have to figure out if it was a cash dividend or a cost basis
dividend, and if it was a taxable dividend or non taxable dividend, and if it
was for a taxable account or a non taxable account.

Every company would just about have to provide every shareholder with at least
an annual dividend statement, which probably means extra work for the
brokerages holding the stock in street name. Then every shareholder has to make
sure they keep the paperwork where they can find it when they eventually sell
the stock. And somewhere along the line the IRS has to be able to audit the
whole mess. There isn't much chance the average schmuck who takes his 1040EZ to
H&R Block will be able to figure it out.

I like the idea that it would make the tax accounting side of public companies
more visible, but the logistics involved in putting it into effect would be
absurd. Whatever the motivation behind introducing the proposal, it couldn't
possibly have been meant to be taken seriously.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/10/2003 1:55:02 AM
From:Don Earl
I've mentioned Interland (INLD) a few times in the past year. (At higher
prices) The transcript of their most recent conference call is available
online:

http://www.sec.gov/Archives/edgar/data/854460/000091406202000866/interland425in
trans1202.txt

The CC pretty well outlines where they are and what their objectives are for
the next several quarters. The company has about $135 million in cash and $25
million in debt, with 140 million shares outstanding. Cash burn is currently
around $2 million a quarter from operations. They're in the process of
consolidating companies acquired over the past year, which they expect to be
complete within 6 months. Projected savings are expected to result in Q4,
ending in August, free cash flow positive in the neighborhood of $3 million.

They have an acquisition on the table, which should close in March, that is
already free cash flow positive and will increase their customer base by around
10%.

The stock closed today at the lowest level it's been since September 2001 at
$1.18. For what it is, I think there's a lot of upside potential over the next
several years if they even come close to executing on their business plan.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/10/2003 9:26:45 AM
From:MCsweet
INLD

Looks interesting. However, there are plenty of these types of companies
around. I'd put it on my watch list for a few reasons.

Price to sales over 1.5 (not super cheap). $170 million of book value is
Goodwill and Intangibles => tangible book value is less than market
capitalization (again, not super cheap).

If growth and profitability prospects are good, then these aren't major issues,
but I'd like to see more tangible evidence of the growth first.

MC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/10/2003 2:21:28 PM
From:Don Earl
<<<However, there are plenty of these types of companies around>>>

I'd be interested in seeing a list of some of them. Just about everything I've
looked at trading anywhere close to cash per share has very high cash burn,
with no end in sight, and negative growth to the tune of 30%. Or if revenue
growth is positive, expenses go up at a higher rate than sales.

There was a PR this morning which mainly summarizes information in the CC and
outlines the steps to free cash flow.

http://biz.yahoo.com/prnews/030110/atf003a_1.html

I really am interested in looking at anything with a strong balance sheet and
some kind of coherent, achievable road map to profitability. IMO, somewhere
along the line, long term value has to consist of a reason why investors would
pay a higher price 2 years from now than they would today. For example; I love
the balance sheet on GEMS, but am unable to identify any fundamental reason why
their prospects are likely to change in the foreseeable future. In other words,
I'd rather speculate on a company's ability to achieve their business plan,
than invest in a company that doesn't have a business plan to start with, or
the business plan is a long shot bet on a cure for the common cold.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/10/2003 3:12:04 PM
From:TimbaBear
Armstrong (ACKHQ)....an update

Sold off almost all of the rest of my position today for .75/share. Am keeping
enough shares to get 200 warrants, just to help me keep abreast of developments
as I tend to lose sight of companies if I don't own them.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/10/2003 4:05:35 PM
From:MCsweet
A few stocks

Off the top of my head, here are a few stocks with cash cushion and
profitability and/or turnaround potential.

CSTLC (mentioned recently on this board by RRICH4)
PVSW
VCLK
MCKC
ALPH
DUSA
CYSV
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/10/2003 5:17:49 PM
From:Paul Senior
Don Earl: there's a dichotomy that I'm not understanding.

On the one hand you talk about long-term stuff like business prospects, strong
balance sheets, etc. For example, "...long term value has to consist of a
reason why investors would pay a higher price 2 years from now than they would
today." All this gives me the impression you are a value investor.

OTOH, several posts back you were saying you thought the market would retest
Oct. lows. And in another post, didn't you say your tried-for or expected
holding period for you with your stocks was a few months, but it was turning
out to be more like a few weeks?

Posts here are free-flowing, logic streams get interrupted, and my memory is
not what it was, so I may not be understanding all this or drawing conclusions
correctly.

If you are only planning to be in the stock a few months or weeks, then why so
much emphasis on safety, dd, value? I mean, what the heck do you care about a
stock's price two years from now or its business prospects in '04, or its cash
burn, if you'll have bought now and exited a few weeks from now?

just curious.

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/10/2003 8:55:23 PM
From:Investor2
Hi Paul. I hope you've been well.

Did you happen to catch the RPM action today? (Big drop.)

The second quarter conference call, available at the following link, was quite
interesting.

http://www.rpminc.com/Default.asp?bhfv=5

Mr. Sullivan painted a very grim picture regarding asbestos liability, not just
for RPM, but for 1400 other companies. I believe I heard him say that, unless
Congress passes a law limiting liability associated with asbestos, many, many
large companies are likely to be forced into bankruptcy. The full impact would
likely hit in FY 2004.

I'm sure that you and other posters have given some attention to the asbestos
issue. What do you think?

Thanks,

I2
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/10/2003 9:11:48 PM
From:Investor2
PS - If you're interested in listening to the conference call, the asbestos
stuff starts at about the 33 minute mark of the conference call.

Best wishes,

I2
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/10/2003 10:33:40 PM
From:Paul Senior
Hi I2! I see how RPM's been hit with the asbestos problem today. Ouch!

I've been attempting to avoid investing in any company with asbestos problems.
I repeat as a mantra the opinion of Jim Clarke here: "There are no small
asbestos problems"

I count at least two errors of omission for me with this tactic: Both
Haliburton and Sealed Air recovered from their sudden downdrafts. So at some
point down at lows, they were buys -- in hindsight anyway. Sealed Air
stockholders suffered for a while, but suddenly the stock doubled when SEE
announced a legal settlement.

I have at least one positive experience:
I sold COO about a year ago after somebody here brought its asbestos problems
to my attention. That stock later did suddenly drop (on asbestos worries), but
I see now it has recovered to near my sell point.

That so many companies are involved in asbestos litigation makes it hard for me
to totally avoid being exposed to these stocks, given how I like to diversify.
So I have possible errors of commission as a result: I have long-term, but very
small positions in HON, ABL, DRRA, NSI which appear inexpensive to me. With
companies such as these, I'm not willing to close the position at current (low)
price. OTOH, because of the asbestos issues, I'm also very reluctant add to the
position.

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 2:00:24 AM
From:Bob Rudd
The Wall Street Journal reported a unique twist to Bush’s tax plan. In order
not to discriminate against companies that do not pay dividends and do not wish
to, retained earnings will be treated as reinvested dividends. This will allow
investors to exclude the company’s increase in retained earnings when
calculating their capital gains tax. To do this you gotta know the change in
retained earnings over your holding period [Unless they arbitrarily specify the
measure to begin and end at quarterly reporting periods]. Economics and policy
makers are saying it's critical to the plan that it make neutral the decision
to retain or pay dividends - they don't want to 'hollow-out' companies with
good growth prospects by encouraging them to pay dividends instead of
reinvesting in the biz. A further condition of either dividend or retained
earnings/cap gains exemption would be that the company actually pay takes in
the US so the Tyco's of the world and companies that don't pay taxes would be
excluded. Proration or no...all this supports your assertion that this will be
a bookkeeping nightmare.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 3:08:21 AM
From:Don Earl
Paul,

There are a lot of days when I don't understand my own strategy, which makes it
twice as hard to explain to someone else what I'm doing at any given point in
time. I do try to identify value from a more or less traditional fundamental
perspective, but once I think I've found one, a lot of TA gets thrown into the
mix. I suppose what it comes down to is I can't see any reason to let market
makers and day traders keep my profits when they're on the table.

Interland is probably as good an example as any since it's been one of my pets
since September 2001. If I had "invested" in it at my first entry price of
$1.17, I'd be sitting here 16 months later at break even, after letting a ton
of trading profits get away. Doing fundamental research from a value
perspective I think gives me a better feel of what the market should be paying
at any given time. Most of my INLD trades were based on the assumption that
fair value was about $2.50 and anything much below that point was a buy and
anything much over that point was a sell. I don't know if it makes sense or
not, but it's a company I sort of view as being part of my portfolio even when
I don't own it. It's also a situation where I consider the company to be a lot
less speculative than it was a year ago, and buy and hold may end up being the
better way to play it. I suppose my reasoning is if a company is a good longer
term value, it should also be a good shorter term trade. Plus, since the topic
is value investing, I figure I should at least touch on the subject every once
in awhile.<g>
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 3:58:32 AM
From:Don Earl
Bob,

I'd pretty much picked up on that part from this article Paul posted a few days
ago:

http://www.forbes.com/business/2003/01/07/cz_jn_0107beltway.html

The real twist is in these paragraphs:

<<<A company's earnings are only eligible for tax-free distribution to the
extent that the company actually paid taxes to the Internal Revenue Service the
year before. So if you own shares in a company that generates lots of cash but
pays little to the IRS--say, because it issues a lot of stock options, claims a
lot of tax credits or makes aggressive use of dicey tax shelters--you may not
benefit.

This is highly significant because, in recent years, the gap between what
companies report as earnings to shareholders and the lesser amount they report
to the IRS has become a chasm. The Bush plan wisely makes a point of only
rewarding the shareholders of companies who actually are forking over some cash
to the Treasury. The object is to eliminate the double taxation of earnings at
the corporate and then the individual level--not to make them tax-free at any
level.>>>

Aside from the paperwork headaches, the real kicker is GAAP goes bye-bye, and
distributed and/or retained earnings are the amounts reported to Uncle Sam. All
of a sudden a whole lot of light gets shined into those dark little corners
where expenses are capitalized as assets, and equipment is still on the books
years after its useful life is over. The potential impact on earnings ratios
and credit ratings is almost too ugly to imagine.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 8:11:17 AM
From:chaz
Don...

I'm glad you gave us your explanation. I do much the same thing. Every once in
a while (great while) I actually get the bottom and top right, or very close to
them. Makes me giddy. Biggest boo-boo....buying ADBE just before it gapped down
from 24 to 16 last July/Aug.

chaz
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 11:20:06 AM
From:Paul Senior
Don Earl: You must be my opposite. Mostly I am a fast buyer and a slow seller.

If your geographical base or financial situation is such that you are subject
to the favorable difference US tax rates provide for long-term gains then you
must believe your short-term trades overcome the tax breaks that could occur
with a buy-and-hold approach.

If you are so quick to sell for a profit, are you also that quick to sell when
a stock goes against you after you've bought? Since you're buying value stocks,
presumably those stocks might be even better values at lower prices.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 12:42:51 PM
From:- with a K
>> I started an exploratory position in HELE today.

Great call, Paul. I had done extensive DD in late October when HELE was under
$9. Today I was looking through my notes after the nice news and strong gap up
this week; I had them on the top of my list titled "My Best Ideas." But I never
bought!

FWIW, I seem to do more studying than buying, compared to what I pick up from
your posts. Anyway, I'm tempted to take a position in HELE even after the small
run, based on my analysis. I estimate a FV at $29, but I hate chasing a stock
after a sharp run. Any thoughts?

Snip from Thursday's PR:

Third quarter sales increased to $142,998,000 from sales of $141,788,000 for
the same period of the prior year. Net income for the third quarter increased
29 percent to a record $16,791,000 from $12,967,000 in the previous year's
third quarter. Third quarter earnings per share increased 30 percent to 57
cents per diluted share, from 44 cents per diluted share.

CEO: "We are certainly pleased with our record results for the third quarter
and nine months. The third quarter is usually our largest quarter of the year,
in terms of net sales. We believe that the third quarter's record results
reflect our strength in the marketplace.

"Brands leading the sales increases in our North American segment were Vidal
Sassoon, Revlon, Dr. Scholl Massagers, and Wave Rage. The Professional division
also continues to contribute double digit sales increases led by our Hot Tools
and Wigo brands. Product sales in the United Kingdom and France led sales
growth in the international segment. We are also pleased with the contribution
from the six consumer brands we acquired during the current quarter from The
Procter & Gamble Company. Helen of Troy sales increased 10 percent to $124
million for the quarter, which included sales from the six brands acquired from
The Procter & Gamble Company. This increase more than offset the decline in
Tactica's product sales in the direct response sales channel. Tactica sales for
the quarter were $19 million, in line with our expectations.

"Gross margins for the quarter increased to 45.7 percent from 45.3 percent for
the prior year. SG&A expenses declined for the quarter to 31.1 percent of net
sales from 33.5 percent for the prior year's quarter. Operating margins
improved significantly to 14.6 percent this quarter from 11.7 percent for the
third quarter last year.

We are increasing our earnings per share expectations for fiscal year 2003,
ending February 28, 2003, to $1.25 to $1.30 from our previously announced
guidance range of $1.15 to $1.20. This represents a 25 to 30 percent increase
from fiscal year 2002.

"At the January 2003 International Housewares show in Chicago, Helen of Troy
will introduce over 70 new personal care products. Ion and Ceramic technologies
are the foundations of our new product innovations for the coming year. We are
using cutting-edge technology features from our professional products and
incorporating them into products for the consumer market. At very reasonable
consumer retail pricing, we are producing products that we believe, feature by
feature, are superior to that of the competition," Rubin concluded.

On January 6, 2003, the Company announced a new thirty year licensing agreement
with The Procter & Gamble Company for the Vidal Sassoon&#174; brand name. This
licensing agreement encompasses various product categories including hair care
appliances, home hair clippers, brushes, combs and hair care accessories.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 12:57:19 PM
From:Spekulatius
Paul, i do much of the same thing that Don Earl does. In my nontaxable accounts
am quick to sell for a profit (20%+) if a stock runs up fast and without news.
So i guess this makes me somewhat of a trader. However i am also very value
conscious because this allows me to average down when the share price goes down
without obvious reason too.
This has worked well for a couple of years except this year where I got killed
in a couple of value traps (EP, ELN etc).
The rationale behind this strategy is to convince your self that there is good
value in an investment so one has conviction to average down if warranted, and
make a bad trade a long term investment <g> this way.
The risk with this strategy is that one may have many small wins and get sucked
into big losses, which is exactly what happened with my investments this year
<ng>.
So I have adjusted my strategy and take a much closer look at the underlying
risks of stocks (asbestos, balance sheets etc.) and pass up on many investment
that I would have done in less treacherous market.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 1:46:53 PM
From:TimbaBear
Value Investing and the quick round-trip....interesting discussion!

Like most posters here, I search for those companies that I believe offer a
good return on (and "of") my investment, and I look for those opportunities the
market provides to purchase these companies at a discount to what price would
interest me.

Like Don, although I approach these companies and my investment in them from a
long term perspective, if the market quickly corrects its mis-pricing of the
company's stock, and I'm sitting on a large (percentage-wise) gain, and I think
the move has been too far, too fast, I'm not going to sit around and watch that
gain dissipate just to satisfy my urge for long-term investing.

If, on the other hand, the gains are more moderately achieved and roughly in
line with gains in performance of the company's business model, then I have no
overwhelming urge to take a 40 or 50% profit just because it's there. As long
as the company performs, and long as the price trades at or below where it
makes sense for me to buy more, I will continue to own it.

Also, like Don (if I read his approach correctly), I use TA quite a bit for
trying to determine the longer-term pricing patterns and the implications those
might have for my decision-making. I usually use TA only after my decision to
buy has been made by valuation analysis or after my price-point has been
reached and am considering sell strategy.

I see no inconsistency in selecting a company in part because the business
outlook for several year down the road looks interesting, and then selling
after only owning a few weeks or months. If the market gives the reward that
quickly, I take it!

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 1:50:30 PM
From:Paul Senior
re. HELE: Small company and I have almost guessed they should have saturated
their niche by now. But profits just roll in (weak pun) and margins are pretty
decent. If they can continue their performance, stock might easily sell for 15x
$1.25-$1.30 their '03 estimate, or about $19/sh ---which would still be a nice
gain from today's price, a bit under $14.

By one of my criteria for determining value, that $19 is the very top price I'd
buy at if I could assume profits could continue at same good rate in future as
in past. I'm too new to the stock though, and I don't have that comfort level
yet.

I'm with you in that I don't want to chase on this spike. I'd guess the stock
might soon drop to 13 or maybe below on profit taking. (Aside: And of course,
as you might surmise from my posts this morning, I will not be among those
taking short term profits, because to me, the stock is still not fairly
valued.) If the stock does drop though in the next week or so, I'll consider
adding more.

-with a K:
Imo, you should go with your brain and not your stomach. You did the extensive
dd. You did place it high on your Best Ideas List. Perhaps you might benefit
from my tactic of sometimes taking on a small position, an exploratory position
to test waters, to see how you feel and think about the stock after you own it,
to bet just a little bit on yourself for doing the work and having the stock
become one of your best ideas.

Creating occasional or routine exploratory positions is one venue your brain
can use to help you to keep your other side - your stomach - from growling at
you and sapping your intellectual analysis and judgmental skills.

jmo, and of course,
I'm wrong many, many times

Paul.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 3:15:18 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Speaking of light getting shined in dark little corners - this appeared in NYT
today:
Top Debt Rating Agencies Take a Look at Accounting
By JONATHAN D. GLATER
http://www.nytimes.com/2003/01/11/business/11RATE.html

The largest rating agencies, which received their share of criticism for
failing to foresee the collapse of Enron more than a year ago or the accounting
debacles last year, are planning to include evaluations of accounting policies
in credit reports.

Depending on the form those evaluations take, they may do more to encourage
greater disclosure by companies and their auditors than new regulations and
legislation, some accountants said.

Standard & Poor's, Moody's and Fitch Ratings, which evaluate the
creditworthiness of the vast majority of companies with publicly traded debt,
say that in coming months they plan to give much more attention to analysis of
accounting policies and practices in their reports on corporate borrowers. If a
company has adopted particularly aggressive accounting techniques that are
still acceptable under accounting rules, for example, analysts at the rating
agencies would note that in their reports.

"The goal is to provide additional insight to Moody's analyst teams," said Greg
Jonas, who started work on Monday as a managing director at Moody's and is
heading the company's effort to build up accounting expertise. "If as a
byproduct of being more insightful and outspoken as to companies' reporting,
that encourages companies to improve the quality of their reporting and
auditors to improve the quality of their auditing, that serves all" market
participants, he said.

The initiatives by Moody's and S.& P., driven largely by last year's wave of
accounting scandals, may encourage auditors to adopt a tougher stance with
their clients, some accountants said.

"It provides leverage for the auditors," said Edward E. Nusbaum, chief
executive of Grant Thornton, the country's fifth-largest accounting firm,
according to Public Accounting Report, an industry newsletter. "You can go to a
client and say, `It may be acceptable under generally accepted accounting
principles, but you want the rating agencies to have a favorable view' " of the
accounting, Mr. Nusbaum said. The auditor can then more forcefully suggest a
more conservative approach, he said. "This might actually be more profound than
some of the regulatory fixes."

Lynn Turner, former chief accountant of the Securities and Exchange Commission,
agreed. "Now you have two competing forces in the marketplace," he said. "If
I'm an auditor, I don't want to be sitting there and have Moody's come out and
say my audit client is doing lousy accounting."

Of course, Mr. Turner noted, the rating agencies face the same fundamental
conflict that auditors face: they are paid by the companies whose
creditworthiness they are evaluating. How aggressive the rating agencies will
be remains to be seen, he said.

The S.E.C. will release a report on the credit rating agencies by the end of
the month, looking at barriers to entry in the business, the role of the
agencies in evaluating issuers of securities, and potential conflicts of
interest confronting them. Legislation passed last summer called for the
report.

Moody's, which appears to be farthest along in its plans, is hiring 10 people
whose job will be to assist the company's analysts in evaluating
creditworthiness, starting with companies that carry large amounts of debt or
that have potential accounting issues already identified by the agency, Mr.
Jonas said. Mr. Jonas, who was responsible for developing audit methodology and
technology at Arthur Andersen, said Moody's intends to add five more people
over the next six months.

If Moody's analysts determine in the course of reviewing a company's financial
disclosures that a company's accounting practices are more aggressive than
those of its peers — perhaps the company recognized revenue more quickly — that
information will be included in their report, Mr. Jonas said. The report would
not be an audit and would not draw a formal conclusion about whether a company
had complied with accounting rules, he emphasized.

Fitch, a unit of Fimalac, created a committee on accounting last summer, said
Robert Grossman, chief credit officer at the company. Its focus, though, is on
emerging accounting issues; analysis of the accounting practices at particular
companies is incorporated into credit reports, he said.

S.& P., part of McGraw-Hill, assembled a task force on accounting issues last
year. In October, it hired its first chief accountant, a partner from Ernst &
Young, one of the largest accounting firms. The company is still determining
what form its reporting on accounting policies will take.

"We will expand our commentary on issues of accounting quality," said Clifford
Griep, executive managing director and chief credit officer at S.& P. "We're
still researching what form that will take, whether it takes the form of an
explicit section of our credit reports or, more likely, references to
accounting issues that are material in the context" of a credit analysis, he
said.

The rating agency's accounting experts will gather their information largely by
talking to management about company financial filings. Ideally, they would also
confer with auditors, but Mr. Griep said it was unlikely that auditors would
want to provide information not included in their report.

"During Andersen's demise, there was an Andersen quote in the paper that Enron
was one of their 50 most aggressive clients, so it begs the question of who the
other 49 are," he said. "We asked Andersen who else was on that list. It was
not information that they were in a position to provide."
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 5:32:27 PM
From:Spekulatius
Averaging down -
one rule I have is to wait at least 4 weeks counting from my last buy until i
decide upon averaging down or not. The rational is that a stock may often erode
because the market "knows" more about a stock than I do. 4 weeks is a
reasonable time to wait and there is quite a chance that things unfold during
this time to give me a new perspective on my investment.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 5:49:17 PM
From:Bob Rudd
I2 - RPM: The great revelation here is not soaring asbestos claims like we've
seen elsewhere. Quite the contrary - current trends in claims are down. The
revelation was that insurance assets are likely used up in calendar 2004 so the
30mm run rate would be 100% picked up by RPM rather than 3mm which is current
cost based on 90/10 sharing provision with insurers. Three scenarios drop out
of this: continuing 30mm run rate in costs; legislative relief coming out of
hearings scheduled for Feb [Republican admin + congress + outrageous
plaintiff's bar actions getting settlements for people with no symptoms + at
least 1400 companies with signficant exposure makes action more likely in 03
than any time in recent memory]; or trends become more negative as no relief is
forthcoming and the plaintiffs bar focuses on the dwindling pool of solvent
targets. I ran the numbers based on current run and tax rates, assigning .5, .3
& .2 probabilities and come up with expected EPS of 1.12 when insurance assets
are gone - not exactly the end of the world:
(113.5*2-30)*.65/115=1.11 Current run rate
(113.5*2-10)*.65/115=1.23 Reduced by legislative relief
(113.5*2-50)*.65/115=1.00 Increased by unchecked litigation
1.11*.5+1.23*.3+1*.2=1.124
[Note that I didn't factor the 3mm of the 30mm that is already in their EBT run
rate - so the 30mm is 10% high for conservatism]
I reduced my position by ~40% in October over concerns that insider selling
might be a harbinger of not such good news. Now that the cats out of the bag,
I'm gonna watch it closely.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/11/2003 7:46:21 PM
From:Don Earl
Paul,

<<<If you are so quick to sell for a profit, are you also that quick to sell
when a stock goes against you after
you've bought?>>>

If I'm able to spot a mistake quickly enough, my view is the time to correct
the mistake is ASAP while the loss is still small. If I've done my homework,
that shouldn't happen too often, but it does happen and my experience is a
quick stop is a better choice than chasing a bad trade with cost averaging.

The problem is my crystal ball is second hand and somewhat unreliable, so
catching the absolute bottoms and tops is a rare event. Even a good trade needs
time to work so pushing the panic button too early is the wrong thing to do if
everything else is okay. I normally expect to see the price rattle around my
entry points for awhile if my timing is anywhere close to being right.

The hardest decisions I make are related to cost averaging. The usual situation
is one where I know I want to own the stock, I'm certain it's under valued, and
I don't have a fuzzy clue where the bottom is going to show up. It's too much
like intentionally entering into a series of bad trades to make me happy, but
if an unexpected drop shows up I'll sometimes add to the position if everything
else looks okay. Out of around 40 trades last year, I averaged down maybe 3
times and stopped out about the same. I don't have the numbers in front of me
but the cost averaging trades came out modestly profitable, but not as well as
if I'd waited for the bottom. I beat myself out of a three bagger on one stop,
a 70% loss on another and a Chapter 11 on a third. Even though one of the stops
was a bad call, I saved myself a really nasty set of lumps on the other 2, and
one of those I bought back closer to the bottom for profits. There were a bunch
of places where I could have maximized profits by being a little more patient,
but I don't feel too bad about less than perfect execution in the market we've
been in.

So I suppose the answer is I'll try to bail if I think I goofed, but not if it
looks like a matter of being a little off on the timing. If the stock really is
under priced, it should tend to correct back to fair value over a few weeks or
months.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/12/2003 1:01:10 AM
From:TimbaBear
Averaging down....

I don't usually "average down", at least not as a philosphy of investing. When
I buy, I usually commit the full amount that I want to have invested in that
particular enterprise all at one time.

There are a few instances where circumstances force me to take a much deeper
look at the valuation. If, upon that deeper evaluation, I discover that the
stock is more attractive to me then I might get more involved. But that doesn't
happen very often.

While, as a rule, I don't average down, I do often average out. By that I mean
that if I have a nice return on my investment, I usually take some off the
table. If the stock price keeps rising past my "comfort zone to buy", I'll
either set rising stops or just get out if I don't feel like watching it all
the time. Sometimes I'll leave a trace position just to keep me in touch with
the company's price performance. These "trace" positions are usually paid for
out of profits from the other sales.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/12/2003 2:28:29 AM
From:Paul Senior
Don Earl. Thanks for the response.

You've given me the idea that maybe this year I should keep track of how my
averaged-down stocks and my averaged-up stocks are doing so that I could have
some statistics of my own in these categories to work with and share.

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/12/2003 2:02:22 PM
From:- with a K
Re: using my brain and not my stomach.

Good thoughts, Paul. Thanks. One thing I'm still trying to learn because of
these last three years is relying on my analysis more and my emotions less.
It's the human side of investing, no?

"What's wrong with this stock? Wait and watch," my stomach says, when my brain
says buy.

"Sell, it's way overvalued, fool," my brain says when my greedy side says let
it run a little bit more.

Ah, the lessons we learn....

FWIW, I'm now of the school that says take a smaller position to begin with and
work your way into a full position. I just didn't act on that with HELE. Or
POOL at $25 or HRB at $32 or LIZ at $25... all stocks that I had been following
but lacked the courage to jump.

- Kris
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/12/2003 6:32:43 PM
From:Don Earl
MCsweet,

Thanks for the list. I haven't had time to do more than take a quick look at
most of them, but I did notice quite a few of them appear to be small, very
thinly traded micro caps. While I haven't avoided those 100% in the past, I do
tend to screen them out most of the time. From what I can tell, most of those
who use this board have mentioned some of these kind of stocks occasionally.
While the market doesn't seem to pay much attention to them, most of the ones
I've seen mentioned do have respectable fundamentals. I'm kind of curious if
you or any of the others have tracked enough of the smaller companies over a
period of time to get a feel for how they tend to perform, and if so, what
approach tends to work best.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/12/2003 7:39:05 PM
From:Investor2
Thanks for your thoughts on asbestos liability.

Best wishes,

I2
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/12/2003 7:44:16 PM
From:Investor2
Thanks for your thoughts Bob.

Best wishes,

I2
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/13/2003 10:28:39 AM
From:MCsweet
Don Earl,

I've noticed that these stocks tend to nothing or drift lower and then shoot up
40% in one day (see ENWV today, one on my watch list. Of course, I didn't buy
it). I think the best approach is to buy several of these and hold on.

MC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/13/2003 1:14:33 PM
From:Don Earl
MCsweet,

ENWV is probably a good example of the kind of cash plays I go out of my way to
avoid. In the past year they've burned through $25 million, revenue is down 40%
and they weren't profitable when it was 40% higher. $31 million on the books
isn't going to last very long at a $25 million annual burn rate. I have a hard
time translating that as being anything other than 5 quarters to Chapter 11.
The average volume is around 20K shares which isn't liquid enough to trade, at
least if a person wants to be able to move a meaningful amount of stock in and
out. A 40% one day pop is a nice move, but there isn't any smart way to play it
for anyone who isn't emailing newsletters to suckers.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/13/2003 2:17:40 PM
From:MCsweet
Don Earl,

The thing to look out for is forward cash burn. If you can do some homework to
predict when this will get down to a reasonable level, you can earn quite a
profit. If a company has any degree of competence (which many don't), it will
get its cash burn down to a reasonable level.

ENWV laid off 40% of its workforce. Unfortunately, they didn't give guidance as
to how much this would save on their cash burn. Hence, the reason I didn't buy.

MC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/13/2003 3:15:50 PM
From:Bob Rudd
ELN: Bailed today @3.86 after loss on overall position narrowed to 10%[Largely
due to adding when it was deeply depressed]. I've been so completely wrong on
this, that I feel fortunate get out with my hide intact. Have no clue what it's
really worth. I underestimated the extent which accounting issues [that I was
somewhat aware of going in] would impact ELN. Putting it in the 'Big drug co'
category probably caused me to view it as safer and more prosperous than it
turned out to be...by a long shot.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/13/2003 8:42:06 PM
From:Investor2
Re: RPM

"Lehman Brothers analyst Timothy Gerdeman said the recent selloff was a buying
opportunity for investors who are comfortable with the company's asbestos
liability. He has an "overweight" rating on RPM's stock.

J.P. Morgan analyst Jeffrey Zekauskas had a more cautious stance, saying in a
research note "we are reluctant to advocate purchase of the shares at this
time, pending clearer quantification of RPM's asbestos issues." He has a "
neutral" rating on the stock."

More at: http://biz.yahoo.com/djus/030113/1528000558_1.html

Best wishes,

I2
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/13/2003 9:31:22 PM
From:Bob Rudd
I2, Thanks. I've read both reports. Of the 2 analysts, I suspect the Lehman guy
has studied RPM closer [and was thus already aware that most of this disclosure
had been made in prior Q's - a fact he pointed out in an additional report
today looking at current Q]...as indicated by the 20 pager he put out in late
October. The JPM guy is more typical of investors that pushed the panic button
- surprised by something that was at least partly disclosed in the filings[Do
they read the filings?]. Merrill was also aware of the issue and maintained a
Buy - here are some of their excerpted comments:
* We knew RPM’s insurance would be running out in the next 1-3 years and today
the company said there was a reasonable probability that it would run out in
04.
* In addition, RPM discussed a GROSS OUTFLOW OF CASH RELATED TO ASBESTOS;
roughly $30mil/year Vs its previous historical average of roughly $15mil/year.
We think investors are concerned that the cash outflow will be greater than
anticipated and perhaps sooner than expected.
* While this news is worse than we thought, we had still factored much of this
happening into our assumptions.
* Cash flow and the balance sheet at RPM remain strong, in our view. The
dismissal rate of cases is very high and the actual number of cases has
declined. We continue to HOPE FOR A LEGISLATIVE SOLUTION, which might make this
situation dissipate, before RPM’s insurance runs out.
* We are lowering our 04E EPS by $0.05 to $1.10 assuming the company insurance
runs out midway through the year.
* We reiterate our Buy rating and think valuation is attractive, particularly
on this weakness.[End excerpt]
[The LARGE CAPS are mine - I use that the highlight stuff in text files]
Lehman took 04 down to 1.00 based on full year exposure and no relief.
Part of the reason for the difference in opinion may be that some overlook that
RPM's disclosed asbestos exposure is due to small retail packages of bondex
patching powders 2# packages and such - not in the same league with insulation
and similar exposures that took down many companies. Offsetting the somewhat
more negative asbestos disclosure was disclosure on the call that the EITF
suits were coming to a resolution that was not seen as material - This, to me,
was as important as the asbestos and quite a positive offset.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/14/2003 12:30:41 PM
From:Wallace Rivers
I hope the thread doesn't mind a mention of a stock which is not a "value"
stock, as most on the thread would consider that term. I post pretty much only
on this thread, that's why I mention it.
I purchased some SGH this morning. It is subordinate to SGU, Star Gas LP. SGU
is thinly traded, SGH is very thinly traded. Being an LP, it has a tax
structure different from common stocks, which should be considered when making
an investment decision. The company sells heating oil and propane primarily in
the northeast/mid-Atlantic US. Heating degree days are running 1%-2% above
normal (a rough guess, on average) in the northeast for the heating season
through 1/4/03. Way above the comparison to the very warm early winter of last
season. The northeast/mid-Atlantic is, and will continue to be, very cold at
least through the end of the week - heating degree days will be significantly
above the norm for this time period.
Sales should be up significantly.
When the dividend was dropped on SGH (not on SGU), the gap in share price
between SGU and SGH spread to almost 8 dollars (SGU being higher). The gap is
now about 5 1/2 dollars. Before the dividend cut, SGH traded near parity with
SGU a substantial amount of the time, very occasionally at a premium to the
share price of SGU.
Given the current environment, I think that the dividend may be increased on
SGH, and this gap will narrow considerably, yielding some nice price
appreciation, in addition to a substantial dividend.
One negative is that the company took out a "degree day" policy which would pay
out up to $20 million dollars were this winter to be abnormally warm. So far,
whatever the premium they paid is for naught. So, that item would hurt cash
flow somewhat.

As with Paul, I've been wrong many, many times before.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/14/2003 8:54:48 PM
From:Madharry
Lets talk- do they automatically make more money as it gets colder or could it
possibly cost them more?

Anyone have any sneaky good energy plays?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/14/2003 9:02:58 PM
From:Wallace Rivers
Nothing is automatic. Where they could go wrong is the spread between wholesale
and selling prices (margins). If they screw this up, then all bets are off.
So far, they have done a good job at maintaining spreads, and they have chipped
away at SG&A expenses, as well.
With the weather prior to this, and with this current cold snap, IMHO volumes
will be up, perhaps substantially.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/14/2003 9:08:48 PM
From:chaz
It may just be me, but this seems more like speculating in weather futures than
in value investing.

chaz
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/14/2003 10:07:44 PM
From:Wallace Rivers
I made it clear in my first post that this was not the standard fare for this
thread.
I disagree with you almost 100% that this is a speculation on weather futures.
First, the comparisons with last years abnormally cold winter are easy; they
were, as I stated, blown away year over year as of 1/4/03, and slightly above
the historical norm as of the same date. That is not speculation on weather
futures.
This week has, and will run, according to my calculation, on the order of 12-15
degrees colder than normal in Baltimore, as a benchmark. That is a lot of
heating degree days. That is where my girlfriend lives, and where I have seen
Petro trucks (a Star Gas subsidiary) driving around, and where I have talked to
the drivers. The rest of Star Gas' major market (the northeast and
mid-Atlantic) will be approximately just as cold. Where I live in the
Northeast, it was -16 F last night, it will be somewhere between -15 F to -25 F
overnight. Unless every weather prediction I have read for the next 5 days is
dead wrong, then one could consider such "speculation" wrong. The most
speculative element in this whole equation is the time frame beyond next week,
I will grant you that. The long term forecasts that I have seen call for at
least seasonally normal temperatures.
So, this heating season has seen a great start for retailers of heating
products in the northeast and mid-Atlantic, I believe this trend will continue.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/15/2003 5:18:41 AM
From:Bob Rudd
Dividend article: At the risk of repetition, I offer this fairly lucid [IMO]
description of the plan and implications:
>>1/14/03 FRIEDMAN BILLINGS: Proposed Capital Gains Tax Change Levels the
Playing Field: Some fears have been voiced that President Bush`s proposal to
eliminate taxes on dividends at the individual level may end up causing
companies to pay dividends with funds that would otherwise have been reinvested
back into the business (to make capital expenditures, etc.) and thus could
actually end up harming the economy. To us, these fears seem misplaced for
several reasons.
A thus far little publicized aspect of the President`s plan is a provision
that, in effect, eliminates the capital gains tax from being applied, at the
individual level, to earnings that have already been taxed once at the
corporate level. The intent of the provision is, seemingly, to keep companies
that decide to retain earnings from being placed at a disadvantage relative to
companies that pay out earnings in the form of dividends.
Based on a conversation with a representative of the Treasury Department, our
understanding of this provision is that retained earnings, which are eventually
"monetized" by investors by selling shares at a higher price, would be tax free
for individuals, just like dividends (or "non-retained" earnings) would be tax
free for individuals. For example: An investor buys a stock for $10. Over the
period of time that he owns the stock, the company has retained earnings (i.e.,
earnings that are not paid out as dividends) of $2. The investor sells the
stock for $12. The investor would owe no capital gains tax because the amount
of his gain equaled the amount of earnings the company retained during the
investor`s holding period. If the investor, instead, sold the stock for $13
dollars, he would have a taxable capital gain of $1 (total capital gain of $3
less retained earnings of $2 = $1). At a 20% capital gains tax rate, the total
tax owed would be $0.20. This provision would presumably eliminate any bias in
favor of paying out dividends versus retaining earnings.
In our view, if the President`s plan is enacted, companies will not necessarily
feel undue pressure to increase nominal dividend payouts, anyway. For investors
who had previously been paying taxes on dividend income at the top 38.6%
marginal income tax rate, eliminating the income tax on dividends would raise
the effective, after-tax, yield on those same dividend payments by 62.8%. The
pressure on companies to increase the nominal amount of dividend payments
would, we think, be greatly mitigated by the fact that the government had
already raised the effective after-tax yield by such a large amount. We would
also note that companies that did divert funds that really should have been
retained (to make capital expenditures, etc.) to paying dividends would likely
not benefit in the long-run. True, if the tax on dividends is eliminated, or
even just reduced, the dividend yield will likely (and seemingly has already)
become a more important stock market metric. However, we doubt that the P/E
metric will go totally by the wayside. Generally speaking (with perhaps some
exceptions), companies that do not reinvest in their businesses will not grow,
and thus their multiples would contract. Thus, companies that attempt to
increase their stock price by "overpaying" on dividends would likely, in the
end, be penalized via a lower market multiple. We would also surmise that a
company that fails to reinvest when it really ought to be doing so will be
surpassed by its competitors, and that the viability of that company`s dividend
would ultimately come into question.
CONCLUSION: This capital gains tax "detail" of the President`s stimulus plan
is, in our view, potentially just as important as the proposal to eliminate
taxes on dividends at the individual level and, if enacted, would be a very
positive development for the equity markets.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/15/2003 7:48:54 AM
From:Mark Marcellus
All I can say is that only people who have never done their own tax return
would ever support that proposal. I am sick of tax "breaks" that make me spend
ever more time, and shuffle more and more pieces of paper, to figure out how
much I owe the government each year. If Bush were really a Washington outsider,
he would support a requirement that each taxpayer should be reasonably expected
to complete their tax return in one hour or less.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/15/2003 9:56:40 PM
From:Paul Senior
Spekulatius, re: averaging down: I like your idea of setting a criterion such
as a four week waiting period.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/16/2003 12:16:54 AM
From:Bob Rudd
Mark: That's a key point...many people won't sell a 'mistake' right away
because they don't want to hassle with the wash sale intricies. And beyond the
once a year reporting is the planning and decision making...If people can't
really understand how it's going to play out for them, they may have a tough
time seeing it as something to inspire confidence.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/16/2003 8:34:34 AM
From:Wyätt Gwyön
i bought HELE some months ago on a nice plug in welling@weeden by Scott Black.
basically called them a "decent company" that was (then) cheap at around 9
times earnings. he also plugged IPCR, which has done OK as well.

on a separate note, i was rather disappointed by Nygren's comments in the
latest OID. he seems to take the $53 pro forma earnings estimate for the SPX at
face value and says it should trade over 1200 based on the silly Fed model.
almost makes me want to short WM. it's scary to see value managers being so
clueless.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/16/2003 11:22:32 AM
From:Paul Senior
Darfot: fwiw, regarding Scott Black recommendations:

In this week's Barron's roundtable, his five picks are:

DHI, RYAN, AXL, RNR, LSI.

I have read too where he might recently have bought GCI, TXT, DIS.

Some posters have mentioned IPCR and DHI here over the past few years. GCI is a
Buffett stock, and once in a while it gets discussed on the Buffettology
thread. DIS has been mentioned too.

Of the five Black picks above, I'm looking at RYAN, and I'd be interested in
people's comments here about it. RYAN's one that hasn't shown up here in a
while. It might work out too, but I've no confidence about it.

Paul Senior
(I hold small positions in some of these stocks.)

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=DHI%2C+RYAN%2C+AXL%2C+RNR%2C+LSI%2C+IPCR%2C+GCI%2C
DIS%2C+TXT&d=t
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/16/2003 12:57:49 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Paul,

I usually also use 20%-down rule. I.e. I reevaluate the purchase only if it is
over 20% down and then either add to the position, keep it or sell it. I think
20% is adequate in terms of how often one needs to make decisions, how much
reward one gets, how much one loses, etc. One thing: the rule does not apply if
there are significant news on the company.

Since I don't believe in stops, please don't tell me that I should stop out
much earlier in the drop. :-)

Hope someone finds this useful

Jurgis
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/16/2003 1:11:07 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Re value managers' comments. I disliked latest Marty Whitman annual report.
This is the guy who aims for 10% annual market-independent return (at least
that's what he said when Nasdaq/SP were clocking 20-40% annual gains). Fine.
Last year his funds drop in value instead of doing 10%. So does he say: "Hey,
this year we failed to reach 10% return"? No, he says: "It was a bear market,
so our fund fell as well". Hey, so where did the "market independent" goal do?

Jurgis
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/16/2003 5:58:18 PM
From:Paul Senior
Bob Rudd, I'll take a little NCR here.

http://yahoo.marketguide.com/MGI/mg.asp?target=stocks%2Fcompanyinformation%2Fra
io&Ticker=NCR&rn=A1082&mxid=100058211&coname=NCR+CORP

Stock seems like it either trades like it's in-favor or it trades like it's
out-of-favor. It's in the latter category now. I'm betting that in a year, 18
months, things may be different.

Margins and ROE are consistently lousy. Still, price/book value is okay, and
debt/eq. levels and cash indicate company might have financial strength to
survive for better days.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/16/2003 7:08:35 PM
From:Keith J
Anyone looking at ACF here? Book value is 12.50, still supposed to make over 70
cents in CY03. Risks yes, but seems very discounted here under 4.

KJ
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/16/2003 8:11:29 PM
From:TimbaBear
Keith Jamison

Anyone looking at ACF here? Book value is 12.50, still supposed to make over 70
cents in CY03. Risks yes, but seems very discounted here under 4.

Looks like the 50% drop today was the result of this news:
http://biz.yahoo.com/smart/030116/20030116one_wond_4.html

Of interest was the last paragraph: ""We now question the viability of
AmeriCredit's business model," wrote Joel Houck, an analyst with Wachovia
Securities, on Thursday. "We believe this is the third time management has had
to make significant revisions to its earnings forecast, including two
write-downs of its receivable. With no signs of improvement in recovery values
of used cars and continued weakness on the part of the consumer, AmeriCredit is
fighting major headwinds in 2003." (Houck doesn't own any AmeriCredit shares,
but Wachovia has had an investment-banking relationship with the company in the
past.) 

I don't like finance companies for just this reason. As an investor, I have no
way of quantifying the risk involved in the loan portfolio. Therefore, it is
always a surprise announcement of "much worse than expected performance" that
either forces the investor to wait and hold the suddenly worth 50% less
investment and see if the market will give some of the loss back, or to take
all the loss at once and move on. There are folks who believe they can
correctly figure out this risk profile, but I don't happen to be one of them.

My guess is that they never recover. But that's all it is....a guess.

I'll pass.

TimbaBear
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/16/2003 10:19:08 PM
From:Paul Senior
Keith Jamison: you'll want to double check those earnings estimates. I find,
from Smartmoney.com, reported by Yahoo: "Management also lowered its outlook
for all of fiscal 2003. AmeriCredit now expects to earn between $70 million and
$80 million, or 45 cents to 51 cents a share, for the 12 months ending in June.
(edit: that's a p/e of maybe 8 today.) First Call's consensus estimate was for
65 cents a share."

At current price, it might work as a trade. I don't see a compelling buy, but
it could be. My fav in the sector is WES, and that's going for 12x eps (before
it might announce its own problems).

I've got ACF on my watch list. If it retests lows on no further adverse news, I
might be a buyer.

Once used car prices stabilize (assuming they do) under the zero percent
financing scheme (which encourages trading in of used vehicles and results in
an excess supply of them), ACF will be viewed more favorably by the market,
imo.

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/16/2003 10:23:49 PM
From:Spekulatius
<< Anyone looking at ACF here? Book value is 12.50, still supposed to make over
70 cents in CY03. Risks yes, but seems very discounted here under 4.>>
ACF is a subprime lender in one of the worst segments of the market: car loans.
Subprime is bad enough in a choppy economy but the car loan business must just
be awful due to 0% financing and falling reposession values. They have
recapitalized recently but are still running into trouble.

I agree with your opinion that they won't make it.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/17/2003 12:22:56 AM
From:jeffbas
Mark, I share your view. In fact, I don't see how it could possibly be executed
by any individual or audited by the IRS. Retained earnings figures are only
available 4 times a year, not when you buy or sell. Furthermore, what would you
do if you owned a company for 10 years which grew wonderfully on retained
earnings, and then took a writeoff which put retained earnings back where you
started (making your whole gain taxable?). If something is totally unworkable,
I don't see how it will end up being passed.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/17/2003 1:13:51 AM
From:Bob Rudd
Dividends again: When earlier I posted that this was too complex to pass, I had
not really looked at all the complexities...the article below does. I continue
to post perspective on this since something will get passed and it WILL have a
significant impact on investing strategies.
The Eye-Popping Complexities Lurking in the Bush Tax Plan
http://online.wsj.com/article/0,,SB1042741901818846824,00.html
>>1/16/03 THE MACRO INVESTOR By STEVE LIESMAN WSJ

When I first got the little scoop concerning President Bush's proposal to
eliminate the dividend tax, I couldn't wait to get on the air and report it.

But then I hesitated. Thinking about it, I couldn't conceive of a way to make
it understandable for television, much less for this column. Then I figured
investors probably wouldn't need to know it anyway. That's because this little
nugget of accounting intricacy told to me by a senior Treasury official makes
the entire proposal so complicated that Congress will never approve it in its
current form.

So, if you don't want to read the gory details, you can skip to the section
below about the administration's statistical sophistry concerning senior
citizens and dividends. But, before you skip on down, take this idea with you:
the quietly proposed capital-gains reduction that's part of the plan to
eliminate dividend taxes is unlikely to pass. The reason: It's a nightmare of
complex record-keeping that would only cheer an accountant.

"It isn't going to be in there,'' predicts Andy Laperriere, who watches these
things for ISI Group in Washington. "Even though economically it makes perfect
sense, it will look like a back door way of cutting the capital-gains tax.''
Mr. Laperriere thinks the capital-gains tax cut is fodder for compromise that
President Bush will use to get the rest of his plan through.

So, if the plan passes the way Mr. Laperriere now thinks likely, stocks that
pay dividends will be far more attractive than companies that don't pay
dividends, instead spending that money on their businesses, providing investor
return through stock-price appreciation. In effect, the tax code will invert
the old distortion that previously favored nondividend paying companies.

(For fairness purposes, I should add that when we recently interviewed Glenn
Hubbard, the president's top economic advisor, on CNBC, he was giving up on
nothing. He insisted that the president saw no reason for compromise.)

The Gory Details

OK, for those of you geeks that find this stuff interesting (myself included),
here are the messy details that are likely to sink the capital gains part of
the dividend tax-cut plan:

As you probably know by now, the current proposal to eliminate the dividend tax
has two parts. The first is the elimination of the dividend tax. The second is
the quasi-elimination of the capital-gains tax.

The administration had to do this because otherwise it would create an
incentive for companies to pay out dividends rather than invest in their
businesses. Stocks in theory are supposed to rise to account for invested
profits, providing the investor with a capital gain.

But you see, if the capital-gain tax remained at 20% while the dividend tax was
eliminated, then shareholders would prefer the dividend to the invested profit
and companies would have a strong incentive to pay out a dividend rather than
invest in their business.

Mr. Hubbard's solution: reduce the capital-gain tax by the amount of invested
profit. In practice, this means increasing the basis of the stock by the
retained earning. Say you bought a stock for $10 and the company invested $1 of
retained earnings. When you went to the sell the stock your basis would rise by
$1 to $11. If the stock were sold at $11, you would pay no capital-gains tax.
Now you would pay 20 cents (the 20% capital-gains tax.)

But there was a considerable hitch. What would happen to a company in a
cyclical business if (not really if, but when) it had a down year? Say there
were no after-tax profits? The company couldn't pay a tax-free dividend.

Because the administration insists in its proposal that tax-free dividends only
can be paid from "taxed" profits, a company that investors thought would pay a
tax-free dividend, would now pay a taxable dividend if it paid one at all.

I called the Treasury to find out and here's the little wrinkle they told me
about: a tax-free dividend could be paid up to the amount of last year's
retained earnings. But, the company would have to go back and retroactively
decrease a shareholder's basis. Got that?

This is so complicated as to almost defy an example. But let me try.

Year 1: A company earns $10 per share. It keeps $3 a share to invest in its
business and pays a $7 dividend.

The investor receives a $7 dividend and a $3 increase in basis with which to
reduce capital gains.

Year 2: A company earns nothing. Now, the company can pay a tax-free dividend
up to the amount of last years' retained (invested) earnings of $3 a share.
But, it must now go back and reduce the shareholder's basis by that amount.

I really want to hand it to Glenn Hubbard and Pam Olson, who heads tax policy
at the Treasury, for thinking this proposal through seriously and trying to
combine good finance and economics. All of this makes sense. If they didn't
take away the basis increase in year one, then a shareholder would
"double-dip," receiving a basis increase in year one and a tax-free dividend in
year two. But let me use the gentle words of Mr. Laperriere of ISI Group who
would not say the plan is complicated, only that it's "administratively
burdensome.''

I guess I can call it a mess, and I admit I don't know how it can be
accomplished more simply.

Mr. Laperriere believes the result would be that dividend taxes will be
eliminated but the capital-gains tax will be unchanged. So there will be a
slight distortion in favor of dividend-paying companies vs. those that retain
and invest their earnings. But it's not really 20% vs. zero. For a variety of
reasons the effective capital-gains tax is actually, on average, quite a bit
less. Some economists say it's 10%.

So the resulting distortion in the potential absence of a capital-gains tax cut
is actually better then the current distortion.

Double taxation of dividends means that some corporate earnings are taxed at
60%. A capital gain is taxed at 20%, creating a 40 percentage point difference.

If the dividend tax is eliminated and the effective capital gains at 10% is
left unchanged, then there's only a ten percentage point difference.

Dividends and The Elderly

While I find the Administration's dividend-tax proposal messy and complex, I've
got some sympathy for the idea of cutting the dividend tax. It's a good thing
to eliminate economic distortions that result from tax policy. We can argue
over whether this is the best time to do it and whether offsetting spending
cuts should be part of the plan. But the essential idea of eliminating the
double taxation of dividends has merit.

What I don't have sympathy with is the way the President is trying to sell this
as a relief package for the elderly. It isn't.

In introducing his package, the president said that half of all dividends go to
the elderly. What he didn't say was that data provided by the non-partisan
Congressional Research Service shows only 21% of all the elderly receive
dividends. That means that the bulk of the dividend tax relief goes to a select
group of senior citizens and 79% of all elderly get no break from this part of
the plan.

"The concern that including dividend income in the individual income tax
disproportionately affects the elderly does not appear to be supported by
either economic theory or the empirical evidence,'' the CRS said, noting that
58% of this group received dividend income. The administration tacitly
acknowledges this. In its fact sheets about the impact of their cuts, one line
reads, "Among those with tax cuts would be 7 million elderly taxpayers whose
taxes would decline, on average, by $1,252.''

Guess what? 7 million is roughly 21% of the 35 million people that the Census
Bureau says are aged 65 years and older in this country. If you're interested,
for the same tax relief that Mr. Bush provides for this group of seniors, he
could give a check to every senior for $261.

Mr. Bush should sell the proposal on the merits and not engage in vote-getting
fuzzy math -- the same kind of which he once accused his opponents.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/17/2003 9:57:56 AM
From:James Clarke
<<If something is totally unworkable, I don't see how it will end up being
passed.>>

This is the government we're talking about here...don't assume anything
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/17/2003 4:36:47 PM
From:Wyätt Gwyön
 dividend stock that sells for $10, and pays 5% (before tax), would yield
around 3% after tax. So with no taxes, and requiring a 3% after tax yield, the
price is bid up to $16.6. A nice 60% gain....I think the journal is missing
something -- or am I?

while this can be critiqued from a variety of fronts, the most obvious is that
you are assuming a monolithic investor whose holdings are in a taxable account
taxed at 40%. whereas the reality is that the vast majority of dividend-paying
shares are held by pension funds and other tax-sheltered vehicles, who are
totally neutral regarding dividend taxability.

moreoever, even the remaining taxable-acct holders are not all taxed at the max
tax rate, which applies only to 1 or 2% of the population. perhaps 30% marginal
is a better assumption.

so if 2/3s of dividend stocks are tax sheltered, then we have:
2/3*0% tax rate + 1/3*30% tax rate = 10% effective dividend tax for aggregate
investoriat.

thus going back to your example, we would say (with the changes in bold):
"A dividend stock that sells for $10, and pays 5% (before tax), would yield
around 4.5% after tax. So with no taxes, and requiring a 4.5% after tax yield,
the price is bid up to $11.11. A nice 11.11% gain."

however, even this falls on its face a bit because it assumes that people buy
stocks for their dividend yield--an assumption that is not supported by reality
in a world where the SPX yield is 2% or less. in fact, to get decent yields on
a historical basis, one must really look to things like REITs. but REIT
dividends are not taxed at the corporate level, so the tax at the individual
level is not going to go away. therefore i don't think REITs will gain in the
wake of any div-tax changes, and may in fact be pressured due to more
"competition".

of course, all this assumes that the dividend tax package--a very stupid,
elitist package designed to benefit the top 1% of the population, and
accounting for half of Bush's tax package--actually passes. i would like to see
the Democrats ax this puppy big time. Bush is simply trying to help his rich
friends and support the stock market, and his clueless advisors gave him this
silly idea.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/17/2003 5:07:11 PM
From:Paul Senior
Jurgis Bekepuris: re: stops.

I never use 'em.

The classical knock on value investors is that they're always early. And many
times I find that to be so. Either by time (stock just languishes for a long
time - in which case stops neither help nor hurt) or stock continues to drop.
In that case, to me, being stopped out is like having the certainty of a short
term loss while giving up the possibility of long-term gains. People call those
stops "taking insurance".

I have trouble understanding logic of people who can argue for their stock at x
price based on their detailed research and study, yet who will nevertheless
just sell if the stock drops some predetermined percent - 10 or even 20%. As I
understand it, that's not what the defensive or enterprising Grahamian Value
investor does.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/18/2003 10:40:09 AM
From:Dale Baker
On stops - value investments are based on a given set of facts about a company,
and conclusions about future value based on those facts.

Very often a sagging share price is a foreshadowing of bad news to come. In
other words, the facts the investment was based on initially could very well
change.

In addition to limiting losses in general, stops can be a good way to get you
out of an investment that is deteriorating, before you get the bad news.

A stop never prevents you from buying back an investment if you believe the
fundamentals are still intact. And if you buy back lower than you sold, the
"certain loss" actually gives you a net gain in the long run compared to pure
buy and hold.

Look at a three-year chart of CPN. If a long-term investor had stopped out at
50 and waited for a better chart and better news to buy back, they could have
saved a huge amount of money.

I consider myself a value player most of the time. I wish I had used stops much
more often last year. I certainly have them in place now, not in every stock
but enough to limit my overall portfolio losses in the event of another major
market meltdown.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/18/2003 12:20:48 PM
From:Paul Senior
re stops. (long) You might be totally correct. You won't convince me though.
I'll be on the other side of the argument.

"Value investments are based on a given set of facts about a company, and
conclusions about future value based on those facts." ... Very often a sagging
share price is a foreshadowing of bad news to come."

I read this as purchases are made based on company facts, but stock sales (by
stop orders) are driven by market price irrespective of known facts. To me
that's value buying, but not value selling.

I can describe what I believe I see as: "Very often share price fluctuations
are random and do not foreshadow any bad news to come."

"A stop never prevents you from buying back an investment if you believe the
fundamentals are still intact."

That would seem to be so, but in my experience, it doesn't work that way at
all. Once out, the person goes on to something else, or is reluctant to buy
back, or wants to wait for an even better price, or buys back and then resells
lower and just gives up.

The classic lament of value investors is that they buy too early (and maybe
sell too soon). I'm a believer that this is so. I accept it and go with it. I'm
not trying to compensate for it. Using stops might be popular with small
investors; I don't recall any books I've read about value investing
recommending this tactic though.

"Look at a three-year chart of CPN. If a long-term investor had stopped out at
50 and waited for a better chart and better news to buy back, they could have
saved a huge amount of money."

The chart's a parabola.
http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=CPN&d=c&t=5y&l=on&z=b&q=l

There are two possible conditions here. Moving stops up to protect profits as
stock rises vs. using stops to prevent losses as the stock drops. CPN around 50
as a value buy? I don't see that, and it's hard for me see you suggesting that
it is or was at 50. If we are talking now about that former aspect, using stops
to protect gains (to save a huge amount of money), I could see using stops as a
mechanical way to take profits.
If you are saying anyone who bought CPN on its way down, say 20 or so, and
considered it a value at that price, would've been better served to have been
stopped out of the position, then sure, stops worked great in this particular
instance. But I won't go from that particular to make a general conclusion.

We will not convince each other here. I don't believe either side of this
argument can provide definitive proof about the success of stop orders. I can
say I am sorry to have lost money on some of the stocks that I've held that've
tanked. Some I went with until completely bk. So stopping would have helped me
here. Quite a bit. OTOH, I've bought some of the same stocks you have either
before or after, and for some of these, I have continued to hold them and
profit from them while you have stopped or sold out for small losses or small
gains.

It is my overall impression, that for me, pain comes before gain, and of the
many stocks that drop after I buy them, the ones that rise make up for the ones
that don't. But I can't prove it, and I could be wrong.

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/18/2003 12:34:24 PM
From:jeffbas
Bob, on the dividend tax break, is there anyone here who thinks this is better
for the economy that a similar value capital gains tax cut on FUTURE
investments?

In my opinion, we want to encourage the companies that deliver growth to the
economy (don't pay dividends) versus low/no-growth companies (ones that pay
high dividends). We also want to encourage people to finance such growth
companies with NEW investment.

My idea costs nothing at all in year 1 (since no new purchase has been held for
1 year), and only gradually increasing cost in later years as new long term
holdings gradually are sold (and zero cost if the market does not go up). Yet
the benefits to the economy are front loaded.

I would bet that elimination of the capital gains tax on new investments (which
we in effect already have for houses) plus some kind of drug plan for the
elderly would do more for the economy, cost less, and have a fairer
distribution by income class (with the elderly getting a break which is more
fairly distributed by income level than the dividend tax cut).
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/18/2003 2:00:20 PM
From:Larry S.
A lot of this dividend tax break is designed to restore faith in American
corporations and to bolster the stock market. Why else have such a radical
action. A dividend exclusion, like we used to have would have accomplished a
tax break. this is something more, this is a reaction to the scandals, the
bankruptcies, the 3 year bear market, acts of terrorism, committed and feared,
Iraq, Bush re-election, etc. larry
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/18/2003 4:11:05 PM
From:jeffbas
Paul, I share your view.

In my opinion investing is about buying ownership in a company (that you plan
to hold for years), not playing with pieces of paper. I like what Warren
Buffett said about waiting for the right pitch and then being happy if the
stock got cut in half after you buy (because you get to buy more at an even
better price). This has nothing to do with stop-loss orders.

Another thing Buffett has said is that he would not care if the market did not
trade for six months. An extension of that thinking is that a public market
(with daily quoted prices which fluctuate far more than the fortunes of the
underlying businesses do) is not a required ingredient to successful investing
- as anyone in real estate could tell you. What a public market does do though
is precisely because of the extreme fluctuations give an investor an
opportunity to buy stock in companies where the price has deteriorated far more
than the fundamentals and to sell the opposite situation.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/18/2003 7:40:47 PM
From:Don Earl
Paul,

<<<The classic lament of value investors is that they buy too early (and maybe
sell too soon). I'm a believer that
this is so. I accept it and go with it. I'm not trying to compensate for it.
Using stops might be popular with small investors; I don't recall any books
I've read about value investing recommending this tactic though.>>>

As I see it cost averaging and stop loss selling are both strategies to correct
mistakes. On one side the idea is to lower the break even point, on the other
side the idea is to avoid riding an investment lower. I think it was Will
Rogers who said, "Only buy stocks that go up after you buy them. If they don't
go up after you buy them, don't buy them.". Unfortunately, he didn't write any
books explaining how to do this.<g> OTOH, there have been plenty of books
written on technical analysis and how to identify bottoms in a chart. Even
though TA isn't considered "value investing", I think it would be hard to argue
that a stock is ever as good a value as it is at the bottom.

I think I'd have to question any strategy that involves being so early, so
often, that it becomes taken for granted that it is going to be that way most
of the time. I don't see it as a matter of which is better; stops or cost
averaging. If either method has to come into play too often, something else is
wrong. Chart patterns form for fundamental reasons. I don't think you'll find a
5 year chart for any company where it isn't easy to see where the trends track
earnings and growth. When earnings and growth are good, the stock goes up, when
they aren't, the stock goes down. For anything other than day trading dead cat
bounces, the only way those trends will reverse is for fundamental reasons. If
the trend is down and a stock is making new 52 week lows on a regular basis,
it's because the market recognizes fundamental reasons for not owning the stock
at higher prices. In other words, it's not a good value, and trying to catch a
falling knife isn't value investing as far as I'm concerned, at least if the
theory behind value investing is to make money.

I probably stepped on a few sacred cows on this one, and hopefully everyone
understands it's just an opinion. The worst lose I've taken to date was in a
company that showed up as being a 3.2% holding by Berkshire Hathaway. The
interesting part is after the company filed Chapter 11, Berkshire Hathaway
didn't show up on any lists of shareholders. Warren stopped out while I got
clobbered good averaging down, and it wasn't a good investment for either of
us. If I had paid more attention to the chart I wouldn't have touched it in the
first place.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/18/2003 9:30:27 PM
From:James Clarke
Occasionally I will use a chart pattern to set a stop loss, but its not my
style. If I would sell a company at a lower price, why not just sell it at the
higher price and be done with it?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/18/2003 10:27:19 PM
From:249443
Personal Opinion of Stop Loss Usage:

I greatly respect Paul Senior, TimbaBear, and so many others on this thread.
With that disclaimer, I have to admit that I use stop losses (mentally vs.
actually entered into the brokerage house).

I am not an active trader, and recognize how a 75-90% loss on any one security
can effect my overall portfolio results. I attempt, in my Ben Graham duplicaton
efforts (try as I may!), to buy when there is a margin of safety. If I do this,
then typically the stock doesn't have any sudden price declines. Based upon all
of the due diligence I perform, I can always miss some important fact and/or
unethical management team that has cooked the books (wcom, ene, eln, lhsp come
to mind).

In summary, if I am positive about a company's prospects and the stock is
moving irrationally and I can't figure out why (i.e., Bass Brothers having a
margin call on Disney after the 9/11 attack; Janus liquidating a holding; hedge
fund liquidation), then I will cut my losses. I have no qualms about reentering
a position if my exit was premature or purchasing out of the money calls to
protect myself against a sudden reversal of price decline. But a mental stop
loss has protected me many times -- to the point where I believe I lose
objectivity if I don't sell. I must understand that other factors, unknown to
me, are causing the price decline. I saw this occur with Comdisco prior to its
bankruptcy filing.

My approach would not be the case, or less important, if I held hundreds of
stocks. But I typically hold a concentrated portfolio.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/19/2003 7:21:12 AM
From:Paul Senior
Don Earl: Perhaps we should distinguish between stocks that drop suddenly and
precipitously after the issuance of adverse news, stocks that drop this way
when no news is immediately forthcoming (as mrcjmoney mentioned), or stocks
that just keep going down and repeatedly hit new lows. Regarding the latter:

It seems to me that anybody who says that their expected timeframe for holding
a stock is a few months (and where the actuality of holding is really a few
weeks), that person's going to view drops in the stock during the holding
period as errors to be avoided. In my case, my view is that value stocks are or
can be problem stocks, and it takes some time before the managers might correct
or overcome the business issues which resulted in the lower stock price. This
means the timeframe for holding the stock must allow for temporary ups or downs
while the business issues get resolved. (It should not be a necessary condition
to add more to the position if the stock drops further in order to profit from
the turnaround, but adding sometimes does add to profits, so I consider doing
that.)

Don Earl, your posts are paradoxical -- at least to me. Which is okay; adults
live in a paradoxical world.
For the fun of it, I'll just take a snippet from your last post...

"If the trend is down and a stock is making new 52 week lows on a regular
basis, it's because the market recognizes fundamental reasons for not owning
the stock at higher prices. In other words, it's not a good value, and trying
to catch a falling knife isn't value investing as far as I'm concerned, at
least if the theory behind value investing is to make money."

...and tie that to your 1/10/3 post on INLD which has been in a general
downtrend thusly:

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=INLD&d=c&t=1y&l=on&z=b&q=l

You wrote, "I've mentioned Interland (INLD) a few times in the past year. (At
higher prices)
... The stock closed today at the lowest level it's been since September 2001
at $1.18. For what it is, I think there's a lot of upside potential over the
next several years if they even come close to executing on their business
plan."

From your complete post about INLD it seems that business prospects for INLD
are now clearer or better than they have been, and so the stock at lows is even
a better buy than before. And you are saying someone who buys or adds to their
position now, and who is prepared to be in the stock for more than a few
months, gets a good shot at substantial gains.

Well that's exactly how I very often see value stocks (dropping after first
spotting them), how I buy them (buy more at lower lows), and how long I might
have to hold them.

Paul Senior
(aside: I'm not saying that I see INLD as value stock though!)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/19/2003 8:34:34 AM
From:Paul Senior
Don Earl: regarding Berkshire. I have currently been re-evaluating an
observation I have regarding buying stocks that Mr. Buffett buys. I have stated
several times that I have found no losing situation if one buys any stock that
he has bought if one buys as soon as possible (when filings are reported in the
media) after he buys, and if one can buy at a price equal or less than the
average price reported in his filings.

Just to recap: this gets complicated because some of the buys are done by his
surrogates. And some of the positions have been small or odd (to me) like the
dinky REITs that showed up a couple of years ago that didn't seem like
"Buffett" stocks.
--------------------------

At this point, I've closed out my position in GMT, a stock I've held for many
years. They are primarily now a rail car leasing company. I've made some buys
and sells, but always maintained a small position in the stock. Considering
this and the time value of money, I'll guess overall it's not been a profitable
stock for me.

It's a stock that Mr. Buffett owns and a business in which he's very
knowledgeable. GMT pays a good dividend (which may not be sustainable). Its
cost of funds (an important aspect for lessors) is higher than its main
competitors because it's a smaller company (GE being #1). It's possible that
GMT would be an acquisition for BRK because access to lower cost monies (BRK
float) would improve GMT's performance.

The questions I have asked myself are: how long am I going to be in this stock
(GMT), and what am I expecting. I just don't see the upside potential. I do see
a downside to current price, but if the stock broke new lows, I wouldn't be
surprised to see a BRK buyout.

In any case, this is one instance where a "Buffett" stock has not worked out
for me. And where I suspect I have given it enough time - years - to deliver
results. (I've had this stock before I knew Buffett owned it, and I may or may
not have paid higher prices for my initial positions than he did. So he could
be showing an overall profit on his position.)

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/19/2003 11:41:27 AM
From:Bob Rudd
Jeff: As proposed, this contains a provision that backdoors a cap gains cut so
as to make it neutral for a co. to retain or pay out earnings. My opinion is
that it's too complex and controversial to pass and is thus likely a
'bargaining chip' I would certainly agree that a cap gains cut designed to spur
investment *should* be better for long term health of the economy - providing
that 'investment' is better informed than the 'money down a rat hole' bubble
era we've seen recently. Unfortunately, since we have no assurance of wise
capital allocation by managements, giving the dough back to investors so they
can allocate it, might do just as well. In any event, a primary driver of this
package is presumably to provide current stimulation and the dividend would
appear to come closer to that goal than capital gains relief...though the more
favorable timing is offset by allocation weighted towards those with lower
marginal propensity to spend as you imply.
Regarding the drug plan for the elderly: We need serious reengineering of the
whole healthcare system - Not Hillary's version, to be sure, but something that
recognizes that the insurance and employer models are broken. The GE strike
over double-digit increases in HC costs is a 'tell'...this is moving up on the
agenda. Movement on this front would probably do more to help restore
confidence and could help the markets if done right since a big chunk of the
profits 'depression' comes from the HC costs rising faster than goods and
services companies sell.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/19/2003 11:59:57 AM
From:Wyätt Gwyön
i think the stops debate will never be settled. in hindsight, there will always
be instances where stops would have been prudent, and always instances where
they would have resulted in an opportunity cost.

still, i have an opinion on them, especially from the value investor's
perspective: one thing that can be said with certainty is that stops result in
higher trading costs. this is of particular concern to the value investor
trading in relatively illiquid stocks. the trading cost is not just the $5 or
$10 or $30 commission; the real damage is in the spreads, which are extreme on
illiquid stocks. therefore frequent trading in and out of value names is, imo,
a losing strategy.

btw, the situation is much, much worse when one is trading in foreign small
caps on foreign exchanges as i do. it would be easy to take a 10-15% haircut on
a round trip in these positions. the only way i can justify such investments in
the first place is if they are multiyear holdings. this reduces annual trading
costs considerably.

on the one hand, (mental) stops saved my portfolio by getting me out of bubble
stocks with acceptable profits before the collapse. on the other hand, as i
invest in value stocks now, i do not rely on stops and am glad for it.

imo, a more prudent strategy than stops is maintaining good diversification and
keeping positions to reasonable sizes. in my own case, a "massive" position
amounts to 2% of portfolio value, and a more typical position is in the 0.5% to
1.5% range. back in the bubble days, i routinely had positions equal to
200-500% of portfolio value (through options and leveraging), so entry and exit
prices were more important.

now my only involvement with public tech stocks is on the short end. i also
avoid stops on these positions, but they are small again (0.5% typical; 1%
max), and i am quite confident that they will be profitable even if they take
temporary 50% paper losses due to some shortsighted mutual fund manager playing
with OPM. but again, my working rule is to keep the positions small.

i actually find a willingness to suffer short term paper losses on my tech
shorts to be very important to long-term profits on these positions for me,
because a lot of money shorts these names and they get scared out easily,
resulting in frequent short squeezes. these occur with frightening regularity,
but ultimately the weight of overvaluation comes back to these names and they
go where i want them to (down); trying to scamper in and out with stops would
just take me out of this game with losses.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/19/2003 1:06:00 PM
From:Dale Baker
This topic may be reaching the unofficial thread limit for "enough is enough"
but my last word will be a slightly different twist: does anyone have data or a
set of anecdotes to indicate that value investing without stops performs better
over time than an investor who does use stops to limit losses?

It's probably an unanswerable question but there is rarely much discussion
about portfolio performance here. Frankly, sometimes the devotion to purist
value investing takes on ideological overtones.

The name of the game is to make money and keep it over time. If your value
judgments are correct then not using stops is a plausible strategy. But has it
worked for many people except Buffett?

Just wondering out loud how Bill Miller, David Dreman, Wally Weitz and the
other value hounds handle this issue. Every value investor or manager is going
to be wrong at least a quarter of the time and maybe perilously close to half
the time. Where do they decide to but their losses and move on?

All these questions and no ready answers...sorry about that.

;<)
%EOM----------------------

